Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE A. SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

CHAPTER 534. COMMUNITY SERVICES

SUBCHAPTER A. COMMUNITY CENTERS

Sec. 534.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means:

(A) the commissioner of state health services in relation to:

(i) a community mental health center; or

(ii) the mental health services component of a community mental health and intellectual disability center; and

(B) the commissioner of aging and disability services in relation to:

(i) a community intellectual disability center; or

(ii) the intellectual disability services component of a community mental health and intellectual disability center.

(2) "Department" means:

(A) the Department of State Health Services in relation to:

(i) a community mental health center; or

(ii) the mental health services component of a community mental health and intellectual disability center; and

(B) the Department of Aging and Disability Services in relation to:

(i) a community intellectual disability center; or

(ii) the intellectual disability services component of a community mental health and intellectual disability center.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.001. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) A county, municipality, hospital district, or school district, or an organizational combination of two or more of those local agencies, may establish and operate a community center.

(b) In accordance with this subtitle, a community center may be:

(1) a community mental health center that provides mental health services;

(2) a community intellectual disability center that provides intellectual disability services; or

(3) a community mental health and intellectual disability center that provides mental health and intellectual disability services.

(c) A community center is:

(1) an agency of the state, a governmental unit, and a unit of local government, as defined and specified by Chapters 101 and 102, Civil Practice and Remedies Code;

(2) a local government, as defined by Section 791.003, Government Code;

(3) a local government for the purposes of Chapter 2259, Government Code; and

(4) a political subdivision for the purposes of Chapter 172, Local Government Code.

(d) A community center may be established only if:

(1) the proposed center submits a copy of the contract between the participating local agencies, if applicable, to:

(A) the Department of State Health Services for a proposed center that will provide mental health services;

(B) the Department of Aging and Disability Services for a proposed center that will provide intellectual disability services; or

(C) both departments if the proposed center will provide mental health and intellectual disability services;

(2) each appropriate department approves the proposed center's plan to develop and make available to the region's residents an effective mental health or intellectual disability program, or both, through a community center that is appropriately structured to include the financial, physical, and personnel resources necessary to meet the region's needs; and

(3) each department from which the proposed center seeks approval determines that the center can appropriately, effectively, and efficiently provide those services in the region.

(e) Except as provided by this section, a community center operating under this subchapter may operate only for the purposes and perform only the functions defined in the center's plan. The executive commissioner by rule shall specify the elements that must be included in a plan and shall prescribe the procedure for submitting, approving, and modifying a center's plan. In addition to the services described in a center's plan, the center may provide other health and human services and supports as provided by a contract with or a grant received from a local, state, or federal agency.

(f) Each function performed by a community center under this title is a governmental function if the function is required or affirmatively approved by any statute of this state or of the United States or by a regulatory agency of this state or of the United States duly acting under any constitutional or statutory authority vesting the agency with such power. Notwithstanding any other law, a community center is subject to Chapter 554, Government Code.

(g) An entity is, for the purpose of operating a psychiatric center, a governmental unit and a unit of local government under Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, and a local government under Chapter 102, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, if the entity:

(1) is not operated to make a profit;

(2) is created through an intergovernmental agreement between a community mental health center and any other governmental unit; and

(3) contracts with the community mental health center and any other governmental unit that created it to operate a psychiatric center.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.07, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 601, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.276, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.82, eff. Sept. 1, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0015. PURPOSE AND POLICY. (a) A community center created under this subchapter is intended to be a vital component in a continuum of services for persons in this state with mental illness or an intellectual disability.

(b) It is the policy of this state that community centers strive to develop services for persons with mental illness or an intellectual disability, and may provide requested services to persons with developmental disabilities or with chemical dependencies, that are effective alternatives to treatment in a large residential facility.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.08, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.002. BOARD OF TRUSTEES FOR CENTER ESTABLISHED BY ONE LOCAL AGENCY. (a) The board of trustees of a community center established by one local agency is composed of:

(1) the members of the local agency's governing body;

(2) not fewer than five or more than nine qualified voters who reside in the region to be served by the center and who are appointed by the local agency's governing body; and

(3) a sheriff or a representative of a sheriff of a county in the region served by the community center who is appointed by the local agency's governing body to serve as an ex officio nonvoting member.

(b) If a qualified voter appointed to a community center under Subsection (a)(2) is the sheriff of the only county in the region served by a community center, Subsection (a)(3) does not apply.

(c) If a qualified voter appointed to a community center under Subsection (a)(2) is a sheriff of a county in the region served by a community center and the region served by the community center consists of more than one county, under Subsection (a)(3) the local agency's governing body shall appoint a sheriff or a representative of a sheriff from a different county in the region served by the community center.

(d) Subsection (a)(3) does not prevent a sheriff or representative of a sheriff from being included on the board of trustees of a community center as a voting member of the board.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.09, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 632), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 534.003. BOARD OF TRUSTEES FOR CENTER ESTABLISHED BY AT LEAST TWO LOCAL AGENCIES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), the board of trustees of a community center established by an organizational combination of local agencies is composed of not fewer than five or more than 13 members.

(a-1) In addition to the members described by Subsection (a), the board of trustees of a community center must include:

(1) if the region served by the community center consists of only one county, the sheriff of that county or a representative of the sheriff to serve as an ex officio nonvoting member; or

(2) if the region served by the community center consists of more than one county, sheriffs from at least two of the counties in the region served by the community center or representatives of the sheriffs to serve as ex officio nonvoting members.

(a-2) Subsection (a-1) does not prevent a sheriff or representative of a sheriff from being included on the board of trustees of a community center as a voting member of the board.

(b) The governing bodies of the local agencies shall appoint the board members either from among the membership of the governing bodies or from among the qualified voters who reside in the region to be served by the center.

(c) When the center is established, the governing bodies shall enter into a contract that stipulates the number of board members and the group from which the members are chosen. They may renegotiate or amend the contract as necessary to change the:

(1) method of choosing the members; or

(2) membership of the board of trustees to more accurately reflect the ethnic and geographic diversity of the local service area.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.10, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.200, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 632), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 534.004. PROCEDURES RELATING TO BOARD OF TRUSTEES MEMBERSHIP. (a) The local agency or organizational combination of local agencies that establishes a community center shall prescribe:

(1) the application procedure for a position on the board of trustees;

(2) the procedure and criteria for making appointments to the board of trustees;

(3) the procedure for posting notice of and filling a vacancy on the board of trustees; and

(4) the grounds and procedure for removing a member of the board of trustees.

(b) The local agency or organizational combination of local agencies that appoints the board of trustees shall, in appointing the members, attempt to reflect the ethnic and geographic diversity of the local service area the community center serves. The local agency or organizational combination shall include on the board of trustees one or more persons otherwise qualified under this chapter who are consumers of the types of services the center provides or who are family members of consumers of the types of services the center provides.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.11, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.005. TERMS; VACANCIES. (a) Appointed members of the board of trustees who are not members of a local agency's governing body serve staggered two-year terms. In appointing the initial members, the appointing authority shall designate not less than one-third or more than one-half of the members to serve one-year terms and shall designate the remaining members to serve two-year terms.

(b) A vacancy on a board of trustees composed of qualified voters is filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.12, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.006. TRAINING. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish:

(1) an annual training program for members of a board of trustees administered by the professional staff of that community center, including the center's legal counsel; and

(2) an advisory committee to develop training guidelines that includes representatives of advocates for persons with mental illness or an intellectual disability and representatives of boards of trustees.

(b) Before a member of a board of trustees may assume office, the member shall attend at least one training session administered by that center's professional staff to receive information relating to:

(1) the enabling legislation that created the community center;

(2) the programs the community center operates;

(3) the community center's budget for that program year;

(4) the results of the most recent formal audit of the community center;

(5) the requirements of Chapter 551, Government Code, and Chapter 552, Government Code;

(6) the requirements of conflict of interest laws and other laws relating to public officials; and

(7) any ethics policies adopted by the community center.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.13, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(82), (88), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0065. QUALIFICATIONS; CONFLICT OF INTEREST; REMOVAL. (a) As a local public official, a member of the board of trustees of a community center shall uphold the member's position of public trust by meeting and maintaining the applicable qualifications for membership and by complying with the applicable requirements relating to conflicts of interest.

(b) A person is not eligible for appointment as a member of a board of trustees if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization receiving funds from the community center by contract or other method; or

(2) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods or funds from the community center, other than:

(A) compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for board of trustees membership, attendance, or expenses; or

(B) as a consumer or as a family member of a client or patient receiving services from the community center.

(c) The primary residence of a member of the board of trustees must be in the local service area the member represents.

(d) A member of the board of trustees is subject to Chapter 171, Local Government Code.

(e) A member of the board of trustees may not:

(1) refer for services a client or patient to a business entity owned or controlled by a member of the board of trustees, unless the business entity is the only business entity that provides the needed services within the jurisdiction of the community center;

(2) use a community center facility in the conduct of a business entity owned or controlled by that member;

(3) solicit, accept, or agree to accept from another person or business entity a benefit in return for the member's decision, opinion, recommendation, vote, or other exercise of discretion as a local public official or for a violation of a duty imposed by law;

(4) receive any benefit for the referral of a client or a patient to the community center or to another business entity;

(5) appoint, vote for, or confirm the appointment of a person to a paid office or position with the community center if the person is related to a member of the board of trustees by affinity within the second degree or by consanguinity within the third degree; or

(6) solicit or receive a political contribution from a supplier to or contractor with the community center.

(f) Not later than the date on which a member of the board of trustees takes office by appointment or reappointment and not later than the anniversary of that date, each member shall annually execute and file with the community center an affidavit acknowledging that the member has read the requirements for qualification, conflict of interest, and removal prescribed by this chapter.

(g) In addition to any grounds for removal adopted under Section 534.004(a), it is a ground for removal of a member of a board of trustees if the member:

(1) violates Chapter 171, Local Government Code;

(2) is not eligible for appointment to the board of trustees at the time of appointment as provided by Subsections (b) and (c);

(3) does not maintain during service on the board of trustees the qualifications required by Subsections (b) and (c);

(4) violates a provision of Subsection (e);

(5) violates a provision of Section 534.0115; or

(6) does not execute the affidavit required by Subsection (f).

(h) If a board of trustees is composed of members of the governing body of a local agency or organizational combination of local agencies, this section applies only to the qualifications for and removal from membership on the board of trustees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.13, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.007. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES BY FORMER OFFICERS OR EMPLOYEES; OFFENSE. (a) A former officer or employee of a community center who ceases service or employment with the center may not represent any person or receive compensation for services rendered on behalf of any person regarding a particular matter in which the former officer or employee participated during the period of employment, either through personal involvement or because the case or proceeding was a matter within the officer's or employee's official responsibility.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) a former employee who is compensated on the last date of service or employment below the amount prescribed by the General Appropriations Act for salary group 17, Schedule A, or salary group 9, Schedule B, of the position classification salary schedule; or

(2) a former officer or employee who is employed by a state agency or another community center.

(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to a proceeding related to policy development that was concluded before the officer's or employee's service or employment ceased.

(d) A former officer or employee of a community center commits an offense if the former officer or employee violates this section. An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Participated" means to have taken action as an officer or employee through decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, giving advice, investigation, or similar action.

(2) "Particular matter" means a specific investigation, application, request for a ruling or determination, proceeding related to the development of policy, contract, claim, charge, accusation, arrest, or judicial or other proceeding.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.008. ADMINISTRATION BY BOARD. (a) The board of trustees is responsible for the effective administration of the community center.

(b) The board of trustees shall make policies that are consistent with the applicable rules and standards of each appropriate department.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.14, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.009. MEETINGS. (a) The board of trustees shall adopt rules for the holding of regular and special meetings.

(b) Board meetings are open to the public to the extent required by and in accordance with Chapter 551, Government Code.

(c) The board of trustees shall keep a record of its proceedings in accordance with Chapter 551, Government Code. The record is open for public inspection in accordance with that law.

(d) The board of trustees shall send to each appropriate department and each local agency that appoints the members a copy of the approved minutes of board of trustees meetings by:

(1) mailing a copy appropriately addressed and with the necessary postage paid using the United States Postal Service; or

(2) another method agreed to by the board of trustees and the local agency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.15, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(84), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.010. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The board of trustees shall appoint an executive director for the community center.

(b) The board of trustees shall:

(1) adopt a written policy governing the powers that may be delegated to the executive director; and

(2) annually report to each local agency that appoints the members the executive director's total compensation and benefits.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.16, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.011. PERSONNEL. (a) The executive director, in accordance with the policies of the board of trustees, shall employ and train personnel to administer the community center's programs and services. The community center may recruit those personnel and contract for recruiting and training purposes.

(b) The board of trustees shall provide employees of the community center with appropriate rights, privileges, and benefits.

(c) The board of trustees may provide workers' compensation benefits.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.17, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0115. NEPOTISM. (a) The board of trustees or executive director may not hire as a paid officer or employee of the community center a person who is related to a member of the board of trustees by affinity within the second degree or by consanguinity within the third degree.

(b) An officer or employee who is related to a member of the board of trustees in a prohibited manner may continue to be employed if the person began the employment not later than the 31st day before the date on which the member was appointed.

(c) The officer or employee or the member of the board of trustees shall resign if the officer or employee began the employment later than the 31st day before the date on which the member was appointed.

(d) If an officer or employee is permitted to remain in employment under Subsection (b), the related member of the board of trustees may not participate in the deliberation of or voting on an issue that is specifically applicable to the officer or employee unless the issue affects an entire class or category of employees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.18, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.012. ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) The board of trustees may appoint committees, including medical committees, to advise the board of trustees on matters relating to mental health and intellectual disability services.

(b) Each committee must be composed of at least three members.

(c) The appointment of a committee does not relieve the board of trustees of the final responsibility and accountability as provided by this subtitle.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.19, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.013. COOPERATION OF DEPARTMENTS. Each appropriate department shall provide assistance, advice, and consultation to local agencies, boards of trustees, and executive directors in the planning, development, and operation of a community center.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.014. BUDGET; REQUEST FOR FUNDS. (a) Each community center shall annually provide to each local agency that appoints members to the board of trustees a copy of the center's:

(1) approved fiscal year operating budget;

(2) most recent annual financial audit; and

(3) staff salaries by position.

(b) The board of trustees shall annually submit to each local agency that appoints the members a request for funds or in-kind assistance to support the center.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.20, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.015. PROVISION OF SERVICES. (a) The board of trustees may adopt rules to regulate the administration of mental health or intellectual disability services by a community center. The rules must be consistent with the purposes, policies, principles, and standards prescribed by this subtitle.

(b) The board of trustees may contract with a local agency or a qualified person or organization to provide a portion of the mental health or intellectual disability services.

(c) With the approval of each appropriate commissioner, the board of trustees may contract with the governing body of another county or municipality to provide mental health and intellectual disability services to residents of that county or municipality.

(d) A community center may provide services to a person who voluntarily seeks assistance or who has been committed to that center.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0155. FOR WHOM SERVICES MAY BE PROVIDED. (a) This subtitle does not prevent a community center from providing services to:

(1) a person with a chemical dependency;

(2) a person with a developmental disability; or

(3) a person younger than four years of age who is eligible for early childhood intervention services.

(b) A community center may provide those services by contracting with a public or private agency in addition to the appropriate department.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.21, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 7(a), eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.016. SCREENING AND CONTINUING CARE SERVICES. (a) A community center shall provide screening services for:

(1) a person who requests voluntary admission to a Department of State Health Services facility for persons with mental illness; and

(2) a person for whom proceedings for involuntary commitment to a Department of State Health Services or Department of Aging and Disability Services facility for persons with mental illness or an intellectual disability have been initiated.

(b) A community center shall provide continuing mental health and physical care services for a person referred to the center by a Department of State Health Services facility and for whom the facility superintendent has recommended a continuing care plan.

(c) Services provided under this section must be consistent with the applicable rules and standards of each appropriate department.

(d) The appropriate commissioner may designate a facility other than the community center to provide the screening or continuing care services if:

(1) local conditions indicate that the other facility can provide the services more economically and effectively; or

(2) the commissioner determines that local conditions may impose an undue burden on the community center.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.017. FEES FOR SERVICES. (a) A community center shall charge reasonable fees for services the center provides, unless prohibited by other service contracts or law.

(b) The community center may not deny services to a person because of inability to pay for the services.

(c) The community center has the same rights, privileges, and powers for collecting fees for treating patients or clients that each appropriate department has by law.

(d) The county or district attorney of the county in which the community center is located shall represent the center in collecting fees when the center's executive director requests the assistance.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.22, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0175. TRUST EXEMPTION. (a) If a patient or client is the beneficiary of a trust that has an aggregate principal of $250,000 or less, the corpus or income of the trust is not considered to be the property of the patient or client or the patient's or client's estate and is not liable for the patient's or client's support. If the aggregate principal of the trust exceeds $250,000, only the portion of the corpus of the trust that exceeds that amount and the income attributable to that portion are considered to be the property of the patient or client or the patient's or client's estate and are liable for the patient's or client's support.

(b) To qualify for the exemption provided by Subsection (a), the trust and the trustee must comply with the requirements prescribed by Sections 552.018 and 593.081.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1020, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.018. GIFTS AND GRANTS. A community center may accept gifts and grants of money, personal property, and real property to use in providing the center's programs and services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.23, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.019. CONTRIBUTION BY LOCAL AGENCY. A participating local agency may contribute land, buildings, facilities, other real and personal property, personnel, and funds to administer the community center's programs and services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.23, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.020. ACQUISITION AND CONSTRUCTION OF PROPERTY AND FACILITIES BY COMMUNITY CENTER. (a) A community center may purchase or lease-purchase real and personal property and may construct buildings and facilities.

(b) The board of trustees shall require that an appraiser certified by the Texas Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board conduct an independent appraisal of real estate the community center intends to purchase. The board of trustees may waive this requirement if the purchase price is less than the value listed for the property by the local appraisal district and the property has been appraised by the local appraisal district within the preceding two years. A community center may not purchase or lease-purchase property for an amount that is greater than the property's appraised value unless:

(1) the purchase or lease-purchase of that property at that price is necessary;

(2) the board of trustees documents in the official minutes the reasons why the purchase or lease-purchase is necessary at that price; and

(3) a majority of the board approves the transaction.

(c) The board of trustees shall establish in accordance with relevant rules of each appropriate department competitive bidding procedures and practices for capital purchases and for purchases involving department funds or required local matching funds.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.23, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 8, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.021. APPROVAL AND NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) A community center must receive from each appropriate department prior written approval to acquire real property, including a building, if the acquisition involves the use of funds of that department or local funds required to match funds of that department. In addition, for acquisition of nonresidential property, the community center must notify each local agency that appoints members to the board of trustees not later than the 31st day before it enters into a binding obligation to acquire the property.

(b) A community center must notify each appropriate department and each local agency that appoints members to the board of trustees not later than the 31st day before it enters into a binding obligation to acquire real property, including a building, if the acquisition does not involve the use of funds of that department or local funds required to match funds of that department. Each appropriate commissioner, on request, may waive the 30-day requirement on a case-by-case basis.

(c) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to the approval and notification process.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.022. FINANCING OF PROPERTY AND IMPROVEMENTS. (a) To acquire or to refinance the acquisition of real and personal property, to construct improvements to property, or to finance all or part of a payment owed or to be owed on a credit agreement, a community center may contract in accordance with Subchapter A, Chapter 271, Local Government Code, or issue, execute, refinance, or refund bonds, notes, obligations, or contracts. The community center may secure the payment of the bonds, notes, obligations, or contracts with a security interest in or pledge of its revenues or by granting a mortgage on any of its properties.

(a-1) For purposes of Subsection (a), "revenues" includes the following, as those terms are defined by Section 9.102, Business & Commerce Code:

(1) an account;

(2) a chattel paper;

(3) a commercial tort claim;

(4) a deposit account;

(5) a document;

(6) a general intangible;

(7) a health care insurance receivable;

(8) an instrument;

(9) investment property;

(10) a letter-of-credit right; and

(11) proceeds.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (f), the community center shall issue the bonds, notes, or obligations in accordance with Chapters 1201 and 1371, Government Code. The attorney general must approve before issuance:

(1) notes issued in the form of public securities, as that term is defined by Section 1201.002, Government Code;

(2) obligations, as that term is defined by Section 1371.001, Government Code; and

(3) bonds.

(c) A limitation prescribed in Subchapter A, Chapter 271, Local Government Code, relating to real property and the construction of improvements to real property, does not apply to a community center.

(e) A county or municipality acting alone or two or more counties or municipalities acting jointly pursuant to interlocal contract may create a public facility corporation to act on behalf of one or more community centers pursuant to Chapter 303, Local Government Code. Such counties or municipalities may exercise the powers of a sponsor under that chapter, and any such corporation may exercise the powers of a corporation under that chapter (including but not limited to the power to issue bonds). The corporation may exercise its powers on behalf of community centers in such manner as may be prescribed by the articles and bylaws of the corporation, provided that in no event shall one community center ever be liable to pay the debts or obligation or be liable for the acts, actions, or undertakings of another community center.

(f) The board of trustees of a community center may authorize the issuance of an anticipation note in the same manner, using the same procedure, and with the same rights under which an eligible school district may authorize issuance under Chapter 1431, Government Code, except that anticipation notes issued for the purposes described by Section 1431.004(a)(2), Government Code, may not, in the fiscal year in which the attorney general approves the notes for a community center, exceed 50 percent of the revenue anticipated to be collected in that year.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.24, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 16, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.277, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 826 (S.B. 812), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 71), Sec. 22(13), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(97), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.023. SALE OF REAL PROPERTY ACQUIRED SOLELY THROUGH PRIVATE GIFT OR GRANT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), a community center may sell center real property, including a building, without the approval of each appropriate department or any local agency that appoints members to the board of trustees, only if the real property was acquired solely through a gift or grant of money or real property from a private entity, including an individual.

(b) A community center that acquires real property by gift or grant shall, on the date the center acquires the gift or grant, notify the private entity providing the gift or grant that:

(1) the center may subsequently sell the real property; and

(2) the sale is subject to the provisions of this section.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), real property sold under Subsection (a) must be sold for the property's fair market value.

(d) Real property sold under Subsection (a) may be sold for less than fair market value only if the board of trustees adopts a resolution stating:

(1) the public purpose that will be achieved by the sale; and

(2) the conditions and circumstances for the sale, including conditions to accomplish and maintain the public purpose.

(e) A community center must notify each appropriate department and each local agency that appoints members to the board of trustees not later than the 31st day before the date the center enters into a binding obligation to sell real property under this section. Each appropriate commissioner, on request, may waive the 30-day notice requirement on a case-by-case basis.

(f) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to the notification process.

(g) A community center may use proceeds received from a sale of real property under this section only for a purpose authorized by this subchapter or for a public purpose authorized for a community center by state or federal law.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 231 (H.B. 243), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.031. SURPLUS PERSONAL PROPERTY. The executive commissioner, in coordination with the appropriate department, may transfer, with or without reimbursement, ownership and possession of surplus personal property under that department's control or jurisdiction to a community center for use in providing mental health or intellectual disability services, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.032. RESEARCH. A community center may engage in research and may contract for that purpose.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.033. LIMITATION ON DEPARTMENT CONTROL AND REVIEW. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that each department limit its control over, and routine reviews of, community center programs to those programs that:

(1) use funds from that department or use required local funds that are matched with funds from that department;

(2) provide core or required services;

(3) provide services to former clients or patients of a facility of that department; or

(4) are affected by litigation in which that department is a defendant.

(b) Each appropriate department may review any community center program if the department has reason to suspect that a violation of a department rule has occurred or if the department receives an allegation of patient or client abuse.

(c) Each appropriate department may determine whether a particular program uses funds from that department or uses required local matching funds.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.27, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.035. REVIEW, AUDIT, AND APPEAL PROCEDURES. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish review, audit, and appeal procedures for community centers. The procedures must ensure that reviews and audits are conducted in sufficient quantity and type to provide reasonable assurance that a community center has adequate and appropriate fiscal controls.

(b) In a community center plan approved under Section 534.001, the center must agree to comply with the review and audit procedures established under this section.

(c) If, by a date prescribed by each appropriate commissioner, the community center fails to respond to a deficiency identified in a review or audit to the satisfaction of that commissioner, that department may sanction the center in accordance with department rules.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.28, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.036. FINANCIAL AUDIT. (a) The executive commissioner shall prescribe procedures for financial audits of community centers. The executive commissioner shall develop the procedures with the assistance of the state agencies and departments that contract with community centers. The executive commissioner shall coordinate with each of those state agencies and departments to incorporate each agency's financial and compliance requirements for a community center into a single audit that meets the requirements of Section 534.068 or 534.121, as appropriate. Before prescribing or amending the procedures, the executive commissioner shall set a deadline for those state agencies and departments to submit to the executive commissioner proposals relating to the financial audit procedures. The procedures must be consistent with any requirements connected with federal funding received by the community center.

(b) Each state agency or department that contracts with a community center shall comply with the procedures developed under this section.

(c) The executive commissioner shall develop protocols for a state agency or department to conduct additional financial audit activities of a community center.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.037. PROGRAM AUDIT. (a) The executive commissioner shall coordinate with each state agency or department that contracts with a community center to prescribe procedures based on risk assessment for coordinated program audits of the activities of a community center. The procedures must be consistent with any requirements connected with federal funding received by the community center.

(b) A program audit of a community center must be performed in accordance with procedures developed under this section.

(c) This section does not prohibit a state agency or department or an entity providing funding to a community center from investigating a complaint against or performing additional contract monitoring of a community center.

(d) A program audit under this section must evaluate:

(1) the extent to which the community center is achieving the desired results or benefits established by the legislature or by a state agency or department;

(2) the effectiveness of the community center's organizations, programs, activities, or functions; and

(3) whether the community center is in compliance with applicable laws.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.038. APPOINTMENT OF MANAGER OR MANAGEMENT TEAM. (a) Each appropriate commissioner may appoint a manager or management team to manage and operate a community center if the commissioner finds that the center or an officer or employee of the center:

(1) intentionally, recklessly, or negligently failed to discharge the center's duties under a contract with that department;

(2) misused state or federal money;

(3) engaged in a fraudulent act, transaction, practice, or course of business;

(4) endangers or may endanger the life, health, or safety of a person served by the center;

(5) failed to keep fiscal records or maintain proper control over center assets as prescribed by Chapter 783, Government Code;

(6) failed to respond to a deficiency in a review or audit;

(7) substantially failed to operate within the functions and purposes defined in the center's plan; or

(8) otherwise substantially failed to comply with this subchapter or rules of that department.

(b) Each appropriate department shall give written notification to the center and local agency or combination of agencies responsible for making appointments to the local board of trustees regarding:

(1) the appointment of the manager or management team; and

(2) the circumstances on which the appointment is based.

(c) Each appropriate commissioner may require the center to pay costs incurred by the manager or management team.

(d) The center may appeal a commissioner's decision to appoint a manager or management team as prescribed by rules of that department. The filing of a notice of appeal stays the appointment unless the commissioner based the appointment on a finding under Subsection (a)(2) or (4).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1520, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 839, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.039. POWERS AND DUTIES OF MANAGEMENT TEAM. (a) As each appropriate commissioner determines for each appointment, a manager or management team appointed under Section 534.038 may:

(1) evaluate, redesign, modify, administer, supervise, or monitor a procedure, operation, or the management of a community center;

(2) hire, supervise, discipline, reassign, or terminate the employment of a center employee;

(3) reallocate a resource and manage an asset of the center;

(4) provide technical assistance to an officer or employee of the center;

(5) require or provide staff development;

(6) require that a financial transaction, expenditure, or contract for goods and services must be approved by the manager or management team;

(7) redesign, modify, or terminate a center program or service;

(8) direct the executive director, local board of trustees, chief financial officer, or a fiscal or program officer of the center to take an action;

(9) exercise a power or duty of an officer or employee of the center; or

(10) make a recommendation to the local agency or combination of agencies responsible for appointments to the local board of trustees regarding the removal of a center trustee.

(b) The manager or management team shall supervise the exercise of a power or duty by the local board of trustees.

(c) The manager or management team shall report monthly to each appropriate commissioner and local board of trustees on actions taken.

(d) A manager or management team appointed under this section may not use an asset or money contributed by a county, municipality, or other local funding entity without the approval of the county, municipality, or entity.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1520, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.040. RESTORING MANAGEMENT TO CENTER. (a) Each month, each appropriate commissioner shall evaluate the performance of a community center managed by a manager or team appointed under Section 534.038 to determine the feasibility of restoring the center's management and operation to a local board of trustees.

(b) The authority of the manager or management team continues until each appropriate commissioner determines that the relevant factors listed under Section 534.038(a) no longer apply.

(c) Following a determination under Subsection (b), each appropriate commissioner shall terminate the authority of the manager or management team and restore authority to manage and operate the center to the center's authorized officers and employees.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1520, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 839, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. COMMUNITY-BASED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES

Sec. 534.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.052. RULES AND STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules, including standards, the executive commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to ensure the adequate provision of community-based mental health services through a local mental health authority under this subchapter.

(b) The department shall send a copy of the rules to each local mental health authority or other provider receiving contract funds as a local mental health authority or designated provider.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.29, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.053. REQUIRED COMMUNITY-BASED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES. (a) The department shall ensure that, at a minimum, the following services are available in each service area:

(1) 24-hour emergency screening and rapid crisis stabilization services;

(2) community-based crisis residential services or hospitalization;

(3) community-based assessments, including the development of interdisciplinary treatment plans and diagnosis and evaluation services;

(4) medication-related services, including medication clinics, laboratory monitoring, medication education, mental health maintenance education, and the provision of medication; and

(5) psychosocial rehabilitation programs, including social support activities, independent living skills, and vocational training.

(b) The department shall arrange for appropriate community-based services to be available in each service area for each person discharged from a department facility who is in need of care.

(c) To the extent that resources are available, the department shall:

(1) ensure that the services listed in this section are available for children, including adolescents, as well as adults, in each service area;

(2) emphasize early intervention services for children, including adolescents, who meet the department's definition of being at high risk of developing severe emotional disturbances or severe mental illnesses; and

(3) ensure that services listed in this section are available for defendants required to submit to mental health treatment under Article 17.032, 42A.104, or 42A.506, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 4.021, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.69, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 534.0535. JOINT DISCHARGE PLANNING. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt or amend, and the department shall enforce, rules that require continuity of services and planning for patient care between department facilities and local mental health authorities.

(b) At a minimum, the rules must:

(1) specify the local mental health authority's responsibility for ensuring the successful transition of patients who are determined by the facility to be medically appropriate for discharge; and

(2) require participation by a department facility in joint discharge planning with a local mental health authority before the facility discharges a patient or places the patient on an extended furlough with an intent to discharge.

(c) The local mental health authority shall plan with the department facility to determine the appropriate community services for the patient.

(d) The local mental health authority shall arrange for the provision of the services upon discharge.

(e) The commission shall require each facility to designate at least one employee to provide transition support services for patients who are determined medically appropriate for discharge from the facility.

(f) Transition support services provided by the local mental health authority must be designed to complement joint discharge planning efforts and may include:

(1) enhanced services and supports for complex or high-need patients, including services and supports necessary to create viable discharge or outpatient management plans; and

(2) post-discharge monitoring for up to one year after the discharge date to reduce the likelihood of readmission.

(g) The commission shall ensure that each department facility concentrates the provision of transition support services for patients who have been:

(1) admitted to and discharged from a facility multiple times during a 30-day period; or

(2) in the facility for longer than 365 consecutive days.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.30, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1035 (S.B. 26), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 534.054. DESIGNATION OF PROVIDER. (a) The department shall identify and contract with a local mental health authority for each service area to ensure that services are provided to patient populations determined by the department. A local mental health authority shall ensure that services to address the needs of priority populations are provided as required by the department and shall comply with the rules and standards adopted under Section 534.052.

(c) The department may contract with a local agency or a private provider or organization to act as a designated provider of a service if the department:

(1) cannot negotiate a contract with a local mental health authority to ensure that a specific required service for priority populations is available in that service area; or

(2) determines that a local mental health authority does not have the capacity to ensure the availability of that service.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.31, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.055. CONTRACTS FOR CERTAIN COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) The executive commissioner shall design a competitive procurement or similar system that a mental health authority shall use in awarding an initial contract for the provision of services at the community level for persons with mental illness, including residential services, if the contract involves the use of state money or money for which the state has oversight responsibility.

(b) The system must require that each local mental health authority:

(1) ensure public participation in the authority's decisions regarding whether to provide or to contract for a service;

(2) make a reasonable effort to give notice of the intent to contract for services to each potential private provider in the local service area of the authority; and

(3) review each submitted proposal and award the contract to the applicant that the authority determines has made the lowest and best bid to provide the needed services.

(c) Each local mental health authority, in determining the lowest and best bid, shall consider any relevant information included in the authority's request for bid proposals, including:

(1) price;

(2) the ability of the bidder to perform the contract and to provide the required services;

(3) whether the bidder can perform the contract or provide the services within the period required, without delay or interference;

(4) the bidder's history of compliance with the laws relating to the bidder's business operations and the affected services and whether the bidder is currently in compliance;

(5) whether the bidder's financial resources are sufficient to perform the contract and to provide the services;

(6) whether necessary or desirable support and ancillary services are available to the bidder;

(7) the character, responsibility, integrity, reputation, and experience of the bidder;

(8) the quality of the facilities and equipment available to or proposed by the bidder;

(9) the ability of the bidder to provide continuity of services; and

(10) the ability of the bidder to meet all applicable written departmental policies, principles, and regulations.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.32, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.056. COORDINATION OF ACTIVITIES. A local mental health authority shall coordinate its activities with the activities of other appropriate agencies that provide care and treatment for persons with drug or alcohol problems.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.33, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.058. STANDARDS OF CARE. (a) The executive commissioner shall develop standards of care for the services provided by a local mental health authority and its subcontractors under this subchapter.

(b) The standards must be designed to ensure that the quality of the community-based mental health services is consistent with the quality of care available in department facilities.

(c) In conjunction with local mental health authorities, the executive commissioner shall review the standards biennially to determine if each standard is necessary to ensure the quality of care.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.34, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.059. CONTRACT COMPLIANCE FOR LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The department shall evaluate a local mental health authority's compliance with its contract to ensure the provision of specific services to priority populations.

(b) If, by a date set by the commissioner, a local mental health authority fails to comply with its contract to ensure the provision of services to the satisfaction of the commissioner, the department may impose a sanction as provided by the applicable contract rule until the dispute is resolved. The department shall notify the authority in writing of the department's decision to impose a sanction.

(c) A local mental health authority may appeal the department's decision to impose a sanction on the authority. The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the appeal procedure.

(d) The filing of a notice of appeal stays the imposition of the department's decision to impose a sanction except when an act or omission by a local mental health authority is endangering or may endanger the life, health, welfare, or safety of a person.

(e) While an appeal under this section is pending, the department may limit general revenue allocations to a local mental health authority to monthly distributions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.35, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.060. PROGRAM AND SERVICE MONITORING AND REVIEW OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The department shall develop mechanisms for monitoring the services provided by a local mental health authority.

(b) The department shall review the program quality and program performance results of a local mental health authority in accordance with a risk assessment and evaluation system appropriate to the authority's contract requirements. The department may determine the scope of the review.

(c) A contract between a local mental health authority and the department must authorize the department to have unrestricted access to all facilities, records, data, and other information under the control of the authority as necessary to enable the department to audit, monitor, and review the financial and program activities and services associated with department funds.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.36, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0601. COORDINATED PROGRAM AUDITS OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall coordinate with each agency or department of the state that contracts with a local mental health authority to prescribe procedures for a coordinated program audit of the authority. The procedures must be:

(1) consistent with the requirements for the receipt of federal funding by the authority; and

(2) based on risk assessment.

(b) A program audit must evaluate:

(1) the extent to which a local mental health authority is achieving the results or benefits established by an agency or department of the state or by the legislature;

(2) the effectiveness of the authority's organization, program, activities, or functions; and

(3) the authority's compliance with law.

(c) A program audit of a local mental health authority must be performed in accordance with the procedures prescribed under this section.

(d) The department may not implement a procedure for a program audit under this section without the approval of the executive commissioner.

(e) This section does not prohibit an agency, department, or other entity providing funding to a local mental health authority from investigating a complaint against the authority or performing additional contract monitoring of the authority.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0602. FINANCIAL AUDITS OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall prescribe procedures for a financial audit of a local mental health authority. The procedures must be consistent with requirements for the receipt of federal funding by the authority.

(b) The executive commissioner shall develop the procedures with the assistance of each agency or department of the state that contracts with a local mental health authority. The executive commissioner shall incorporate each agency's or department's financial or compliance requirements for an authority into a single audit that meets the requirements of Section 534.068.

(c) Before prescribing or amending a procedure under this section, the executive commissioner must set a deadline for agencies and departments of the state that contract with local mental health authorities to submit proposals relating to the procedure.

(d) An agency or department of the state that contracts with a local mental health authority must comply with a procedure developed under this section.

(e) The department may not implement a procedure under this section without the approval of the executive commissioner.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0603. ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL AUDIT ACTIVITY. (a) The executive commissioner shall develop protocols for an agency or department of the state to conduct additional financial audit activities of a local mental health authority.

(b) An agency or department of the state may not conduct additional financial audit activities relating to a local mental health authority without the approval of the executive commissioner.

(c) This section, and a protocol developed under this section, do not apply to an audit conducted under Chapter 321, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.061. PROGRAM AND SERVICE MONITORING AND REVIEW OF CERTAIN COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) The local mental health authority shall monitor the services of a provider who contracts with the authority to provide services for persons with mental illness to ensure that the provider is delivering the services in a manner consistent with the provider's contract.

(b) Each provider contract involving the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility must authorize the local mental health authority or the authority's designee and the department or the department's designee to have unrestricted access to all facilities, records, data, and other information under the control of the provider as necessary to enable the department to audit, monitor, and review the financial and program activities and services associated with the contract.

(c) The department may withdraw funding from a local mental health authority that fails to cancel a contract with a provider involving the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility if:

(1) the provider is not fulfilling its contractual obligations; and

(2) the authority has not taken appropriate action to remedy the problem in accordance with department rules.

(d) The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe procedures a local mental health authority must follow in remedying a problem with a provider.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.063. PEER REVIEW ORGANIZATION. The department shall assist a local mental health authority in developing a peer review organization to provide self-assessment of programs and to supplement department reviews under Section 534.060.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.37, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.064. CONTRACT RENEWAL. The executive commissioner may refuse to renew a contract with a local mental health authority and may select other agencies, entities, or organizations to be the local mental health authority if the department's evaluation of the authority's performance under Section 534.059 indicates that the authority cannot ensure the availability of the specific services to priority populations required by the department and this subtitle.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.38, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.065. RENEWAL OF CERTAIN CONTRACTS FOR COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) A local mental health authority shall review a contract scheduled for renewal that:

(1) is between the authority and a private provider;

(2) is for the provision of mental health services at the community level, including residential services; and

(3) involves the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility.

(b) The local mental health authority may renew the contract only if the contract meets the criteria provided by Section 533.016.

(c) The local mental health authority and private provider shall negotiate a contract renewal at arm's length and in good faith.

(d) This section applies to a contract renewal regardless of the date on which the original contract was initially executed.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.066. LOCAL MATCH REQUIREMENT. (a) The department shall include in a contract with a local mental health authority a requirement that some or all of the state funds the authority receives be matched by local support in an amount or proportion jointly agreed to by the department and the authority's board of trustees and based on the authority's financial capability and its overall commitment to other mental health programs, as appropriate.

(b) Patient fee income, third-party insurance income, services and facilities contributed by the local mental health authority, contributions by a county or municipality, and other locally generated contributions, including local tax funds, may be counted when calculating the local support for a local mental health authority. The department may disallow or reduce the value of services claimed as support.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.38, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 821, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.067. FEE COLLECTION POLICY. The executive commissioner shall establish a uniform fee collection policy for all local mental health authorities that is equitable, provides for collections, and maximizes contributions to local revenue.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.38, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.0675. NOTICE OF DENIAL, REDUCTION, OR TERMINATION OF SERVICES. The executive commissioner by rule, in cooperation with local mental health authorities, consumers, consumer advocates, and service providers, shall establish a uniform procedure that each local mental health authority shall use to notify consumers in writing of the denial, involuntary reduction, or termination of services and of the right to appeal those decisions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.38, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.068. AUDITS. (a) As a condition to receiving funds under this subtitle, a local mental health authority other than a state facility designated as an authority must annually submit to the department a financial and compliance audit prepared by a certified public accountant or public accountant licensed by the Texas State Board of Public Accountancy. To ensure the highest degree of independence and quality, the local mental health authority shall use an invitation-for-proposal process as prescribed by the executive commissioner to select the auditor.

(a-1) The audit required under Subsection (a) may be published electronically on the local mental health authority's Internet website. An authority that electronically publishes an audit under this subsection shall notify the department that the audit is available on the authority's Internet website on or before the date the audit is due.

(b) The audit must meet the minimum requirements as shall be, and be in the form and in the number of copies as may be, prescribed by the executive commissioner, subject to review and comment by the state auditor.

(c) The local mental health authority shall file the required number of copies of the audit report with the department by the date prescribed by the executive commissioner. From the copies filed with the department, copies of the report shall be submitted to the governor and Legislative Budget Board.

(d) The local mental health authority shall either approve or refuse to approve the audit report. If the authority refuses to approve the report, the authority shall include with the department's copies a statement detailing the reasons for refusal.

(e) The commissioner and state auditor have access to all vouchers, receipts, journals, or other records the commissioner or auditor considers necessary to review and analyze the audit report.

(f) The department shall annually submit to the governor and Legislative Audit Committee a summary of the significant findings identified during the department's reviews of fiscal audit activities.

(g) The report required under Subsection (f) may be published electronically on the department's Internet website. The department shall notify each entity entitled to receive a copy of the report that the report is available on the department's Internet website on or before the date the report is due.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 6.39, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 68, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (S.B. 800), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 534.069. CRITERIA FOR PROVIDING FUNDS FOR START-UP COSTS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall develop criteria to regulate the provision of payment to a private provider for start-up costs associated with the development of residential and other community services for persons with mental illness.

(b) The criteria shall provide that start-up funds be awarded only as a last resort and shall include provisions relating to:

(1) the purposes for which start-up funds may be used;

(2) the ownership of capital property and equipment obtained by the use of start-up funds; and

(3) the obligation of the private provider to repay the start-up funds awarded by the department by direct repayment or by providing services for a period agreed to by the parties.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.070. USE OF PROSPECTIVE PAYMENT FUNDS. (a) Each local mental health authority that receives prospective payment funds shall submit to the department a quarterly report that clearly identifies how the provider or program used the funds during the preceding fiscal quarter.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the form of the report, the specific information that must be included in the report, and the deadlines for submitting the report.

(c) The department may not provide prospective payment funds to a local mental health authority that fails to submit the quarterly reports required by this section.

(d) In this section, "prospective payment funds" means money the department prospectively provides to a local mental health authority to provide community services to certain persons with mental illness.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.071. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. A local mental health authority may appoint a committee to advise its governing board on a matter relating to the oversight and provision of mental health services. The appointment of a committee does not relieve the authority's governing board of a responsibility prescribed by this subtitle.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1209, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B-1. COMMUNITY-BASED INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY SERVICES

Sec. 534.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of aging and disability services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of Aging and Disability Services.

(3) "Department facility" means a state supported living center, including the ICF-IID component of the Rio Grande State Center.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1229, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.530, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.102. RULES AND STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules, including standards, the executive commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to ensure the adequate provision of community-based intellectual disability services through a local intellectual and developmental disability authority under this subchapter.

(b) The department shall send a copy of the rules to each local intellectual and developmental disability authority or other provider receiving contract funds as a local intellectual and developmental disability authority or designated provider.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.531, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.103. REQUIRED COMMUNITY-BASED INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY SERVICES. (a) The department shall ensure that, at a minimum, the following services are available in each service area:

(1) community-based assessments, including diagnosis and evaluation services;

(2) respite care; and

(3) case management services.

(b) The department shall arrange for appropriate community-based services, including the assignment of a case manager, to be available in each service area for each person discharged from a department facility who is in need of care.

(c) To the extent that resources are available, the department shall ensure that the services listed in this section are available for children, including adolescents, as well as adults, in each service area.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.532, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.104. JOINT DISCHARGE PLANNING. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt, and the department shall enforce, rules that require continuity of services and planning for client care between department facilities and local intellectual and developmental disability authorities.

(b) At a minimum, the rules must require joint discharge planning between a department facility and a local intellectual and developmental disability authority before a facility discharges a client or places the client on an extended furlough with an intent to discharge.

(c) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall plan with the department facility and determine the appropriate community services for the client.

(d) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall arrange for the provision of the services if department funds are to be used and may subcontract with or make a referral to a local agency or entity.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.802, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.533, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.105. DESIGNATION OF PROVIDER. (a) The department shall identify and contract with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority for each service area to ensure that services are provided to client populations determined by the department. A local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall ensure that services to address the needs of priority populations are provided as required by the department and shall comply with the rules and standards adopted under Section 534.102.

(b) The department may contract with a local agency or a private provider or organization to act as a designated provider of a service if the department:

(1) cannot negotiate a contract with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority to ensure that a specific required service for priority populations is available in that service area; or

(2) determines that a local intellectual and developmental disability authority does not have the capacity to ensure the availability of that service.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.106. CONTRACTS FOR CERTAIN COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) The executive commissioner shall design a competitive procurement or similar system that an intellectual and developmental disability authority shall use in awarding an initial contract for the provision of services at the community level for persons with an intellectual disability, including residential services, if the contract involves the use of state money or money for which the state has oversight responsibility.

(b) The system must require that each local intellectual and developmental disability authority:

(1) ensure public participation in the authority's decisions regarding whether to provide or to contract for a service;

(2) make a reasonable effort to give notice of the intent to contract for services to each potential private provider in the local service area of the authority; and

(3) review each submitted proposal and award the contract to the applicant that the authority determines has made the lowest and best bid to provide the needed services.

(c) Each local intellectual and developmental disability authority, in determining the lowest and best bid, shall consider any relevant information included in the authority's request for bid proposals, including:

(1) price;

(2) the ability of the bidder to perform the contract and to provide the required services;

(3) whether the bidder can perform the contract or provide the services within the period required, without delay or interference;

(4) the bidder's history of compliance with the laws relating to the bidder's business operations and the affected services and whether the bidder is currently in compliance;

(5) whether the bidder's financial resources are sufficient to perform the contract and to provide the services;

(6) whether necessary or desirable support and ancillary services are available to the bidder;

(7) the character, responsibility, integrity, reputation, and experience of the bidder;

(8) the quality of the facilities and equipment available to or proposed by the bidder;

(9) the ability of the bidder to provide continuity of services; and

(10) the ability of the bidder to meet all applicable written departmental policies, principles, and regulations.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1187, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.107. COORDINATION OF ACTIVITIES. A local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall coordinate its activities with the activities of other appropriate agencies that provide care and treatment for persons with drug or alcohol problems.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.1075. RESPITE CARE. (a) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules relating to the provision of respite care and shall develop a system to reimburse providers of in-home respite care.

(b) The rules must:

(1) encourage the use of existing local providers;

(2) encourage family participation in the choice of a qualified provider;

(3) establish procedures necessary to administer this section, including procedures for:

(A) determining the amount and type of in-home respite care to be authorized;

(B) reimbursing providers;

(C) handling appeals from providers;

(D) handling complaints from recipients of in-home respite care;

(E) providing emergency backup for in-home respite care providers; and

(F) advertising for, selecting, and training in-home respite care providers; and

(4) specify the conditions and provisions under which a provider's participation in the program can be canceled.

(c) The executive commissioner shall establish service and performance standards for department facilities and designated providers to use in operating the in-home respite care program. The executive commissioner shall establish the standards from information obtained from the families of clients receiving in-home respite care and from providers of in-home respite care. The executive commissioner may obtain the information at a public hearing or from an advisory group.

(d) The service and performance standards established by the executive commissioner under Subsection (c) must:

(1) prescribe minimum personnel qualifications the executive commissioner determines are necessary to protect health and safety;

(2) establish levels of personnel qualifications that are dependent on the needs of the client; and

(3) permit a health professional with a valid Texas practitioner's license to provide care that is consistent with the professional's training and license without requiring additional training unless the executive commissioner determines that additional training is necessary.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.108. STANDARDS OF CARE. (a) The executive commissioner shall develop standards of care for the services provided by a local intellectual and developmental disability authority and its subcontractors under this subchapter.

(b) The standards must be designed to ensure that the quality of community-based intellectual disability services is consistent with the quality of care available in department facilities.

(c) In conjunction with local intellectual and developmental disability authorities, the executive commissioner shall review the standards biennially to determine if each standard is necessary to ensure the quality of care.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.109. CONTRACT COMPLIANCE FOR LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The department shall evaluate a local intellectual and developmental disability authority's compliance with its contract to ensure the provision of specific services to priority populations.

(b) If, by a date set by the commissioner, a local intellectual and developmental disability authority fails to comply with its contract to ensure the provision of services to the satisfaction of the commissioner, the department may impose a sanction as provided by the applicable contract rule until the dispute is resolved. The department shall notify the authority in writing of the department's decision to impose a sanction.

(c) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority may appeal the department's decision to impose a sanction on the authority. The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the appeal procedure.

(d) The filing of a notice of appeal stays the imposition of the department's decision to impose a sanction except when an act or omission by a local intellectual and developmental disability authority is endangering or may endanger the life, health, welfare, or safety of a person.

(e) While an appeal under this section is pending, the department may limit general revenue allocations to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority to monthly distributions.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.110. PROGRAM AND SERVICE MONITORING AND REVIEW OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The department shall develop mechanisms for monitoring the services provided by a local intellectual and developmental disability authority.

(b) The department shall review the program quality and program performance results of a local intellectual and developmental disability authority in accordance with a risk assessment and evaluation system appropriate to the authority's contract requirements. The department may determine the scope of the review.

(c) A contract between a local intellectual and developmental disability authority and the department must authorize the department to have unrestricted access to all facilities, records, data, and other information under the control of the authority as necessary to enable the department to audit, monitor, and review the financial and program activities and services associated with department funds.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.111. COORDINATED PROGRAM AUDITS OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall coordinate with each agency or department of the state that contracts with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority to prescribe procedures for a coordinated program audit of the authority. The procedures must be:

(1) consistent with the requirements for the receipt of federal funding by the authority; and

(2) based on risk assessment.

(b) A program audit must evaluate:

(1) the extent to which a local intellectual and developmental disability authority is achieving the results or benefits established by an agency or department of the state or by the legislature;

(2) the effectiveness of the authority's organization, program, activities, or functions; and

(3) the authority's compliance with law.

(c) A program audit of a local intellectual and developmental disability authority must be performed in accordance with the procedures prescribed under this section.

(d) The department may not implement a procedure for a program audit under this section without the approval of the executive commissioner.

(e) This section does not prohibit an agency, department, or other entity providing funding to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority from investigating a complaint against the authority or performing additional contract monitoring of the authority.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.112. FINANCIAL AUDITS OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES. (a) The executive commissioner shall prescribe procedures for a financial audit of a local intellectual and developmental disability authority. The procedures must be consistent with requirements for the receipt of federal funding by the authority.

(b) The executive commissioner shall develop the procedures with the assistance of each agency or department of the state that contracts with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority. The executive commissioner shall incorporate each agency's or department's financial or compliance requirements for an authority into a single audit that meets the requirements of Section 534.121.

(c) Before prescribing or amending a procedure under this section, the executive commissioner must set a deadline for agencies and departments of the state that contract with local intellectual and developmental disability authorities to submit proposals relating to the procedure.

(d) An agency or department of the state that contracts with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority must comply with a procedure developed under this section.

(e) The department may not implement a procedure under this section without the approval of the executive commissioner.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.113. ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL AUDIT ACTIVITY. (a) The executive commissioner shall develop protocols for an agency or department of the state to conduct additional financial audit activities of a local intellectual and developmental disability authority.

(b) An agency or department of the state may not conduct additional financial audit activities relating to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority without the approval of the executive commissioner.

(c) This section, and a protocol developed under this section, do not apply to an audit conducted under Chapter 321, Government Code.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.114. PROGRAM AND SERVICE MONITORING AND REVIEW OF CERTAIN COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall monitor the services of a provider who contracts with the authority to provide services to persons with an intellectual disability to ensure that the provider is delivering the services in a manner consistent with the provider's contract.

(b) Each provider contract involving the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility must authorize the local intellectual and developmental disability authority or the authority's designee and the department or the department's designee to have unrestricted access to all facilities, records, data, and other information under the control of the provider as necessary to enable the department to audit, monitor, and review the financial and program activities and services associated with the contract.

(c) The department may withdraw funding from a local intellectual and developmental disability authority that fails to cancel a contract with a provider involving the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility if:

(1) the provider is not fulfilling its contractual obligations; and

(2) the authority has not taken appropriate action to remedy the problem in accordance with department rules.

(d) The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe procedures a local intellectual and developmental disability authority must follow in remedying a problem with a provider.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.115. PEER REVIEW ORGANIZATION. The department shall assist a local intellectual and developmental disability authority in developing a peer review organization to provide self-assessment of programs and to supplement department reviews under Section 534.110.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.116. CONTRACT RENEWAL. The executive commissioner may refuse to renew a contract with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority and may select other agencies, entities, or organizations to be the local intellectual and developmental disability authority if the department's evaluation of the authority's performance under Section 534.109 indicates that the authority cannot ensure the availability of the specific services to priority populations required by the department and this subtitle.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.117. RENEWAL OF CERTAIN CONTRACTS FOR COMMUNITY SERVICES. (a) A local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall review a contract scheduled for renewal that:

(1) is between the authority and a private provider;

(2) is for the provision of intellectual disability services at the community level, including residential services; and

(3) involves the use of state funds or funds for which the state has oversight responsibility.

(b) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority may renew the contract only if the contract meets the criteria provided by Section 533A.016.

(c) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority and private provider shall negotiate a contract renewal at arm's length and in good faith.

(d) This section applies to a contract renewal regardless of the date on which the original contract was initially executed.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.118. LOCAL MATCH REQUIREMENT. (a) The department shall include in a contract with a local intellectual and developmental disability authority a requirement that some or all of the state funds the authority receives be matched by local support in an amount or proportion jointly agreed to by the department and the authority's board of trustees and based on the authority's financial capability and its overall commitment to other intellectual disability programs, as appropriate.

(b) Client fee income, third-party insurance income, services and facilities contributed by the local intellectual and developmental disability authority, contributions by a county or municipality, and other locally generated contributions, including local tax funds, may be counted when calculating the local support for a local intellectual and developmental disability authority. The department may disallow or reduce the value of services claimed as support.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.119. FEE COLLECTION POLICY. The executive commissioner shall establish a uniform fee collection policy for all local intellectual and developmental disability authorities that is equitable, provides for collections, and maximizes contributions to local revenue.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.120. NOTICE OF DENIAL, REDUCTION, OR TERMINATION OF SERVICES. The executive commissioner by rule, in cooperation with local intellectual and developmental disability authorities, consumers, consumer advocates, and service providers, shall establish a uniform procedure that each local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall use to notify consumers in writing of the denial, involuntary reduction, or termination of services and of the right to appeal those decisions.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.121. AUDITS. (a) As a condition to receiving funds under this subtitle, a local intellectual and developmental disability authority other than a state facility designated as an authority must annually submit to the department a financial and compliance audit prepared by a certified public accountant or public accountant licensed by the Texas State Board of Public Accountancy. To ensure the highest degree of independence and quality, the local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall use an invitation-for-proposal process as prescribed by the executive commissioner to select the auditor.

(a-1) The audit required under Subsection (a) may be published electronically on the local intellectual and developmental disability authority's Internet website. An authority that electronically publishes an audit under this subsection shall notify the department that the audit is available on the authority's Internet website on or before the date the audit is due.

(b) The audit must meet the minimum requirements as shall be, and be in the form and in the number of copies as may be, prescribed by the executive commissioner, subject to review and comment by the state auditor.

(c) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall file the required number of copies of the audit report with the department by the date prescribed by the executive commissioner. From the copies filed with the department, copies of the report shall be submitted to the governor and Legislative Budget Board.

(d) The local intellectual and developmental disability authority shall either approve or refuse to approve the audit report. If the authority refuses to approve the report, the authority shall include with the department's copies a statement detailing the reasons for refusal.

(e) The commissioner and state auditor have access to all vouchers, receipts, journals, or other records the commissioner or auditor considers necessary to review and analyze the audit report.

(f) The department shall annually submit to the governor, Legislative Budget Board, and Legislative Audit Committee a summary of the significant findings identified during the department's reviews of fiscal audit activities.

(g) The report required under Subsection (f) may be published electronically on the department's Internet website. The department shall notify each entity entitled to receive a copy of the report that the report is available on the department's Internet website on or before the date the report is due.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.122. CRITERIA FOR PROVIDING FUNDS FOR START-UP COSTS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall develop criteria to regulate the provision of payment to a private provider for start-up costs associated with the development of residential and other community services for persons with an intellectual disability.

(b) The criteria shall provide that start-up funds be awarded only as a last resort and shall include provisions relating to:

(1) the purposes for which start-up funds may be used;

(2) the ownership of capital property and equipment obtained by the use of start-up funds; and

(3) the obligation of the private provider to repay the start-up funds awarded by the department by direct repayment or by providing services for a period agreed to by the parties.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.123. USE OF PROSPECTIVE PAYMENT FUNDS. (a) Each local intellectual and developmental disability authority that receives prospective payment funds shall submit to the department a quarterly report that clearly identifies how the provider or program used the funds during the preceding fiscal quarter.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the form of the report, the specific information that must be included in the report, and the deadlines for submitting the report.

(c) The department may not provide prospective payment funds to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority that fails to submit the quarterly reports required by this section.

(d) In this section, "prospective payment funds" means money the department prospectively provides to a local intellectual and developmental disability authority to provide community services to certain persons with an intellectual disability.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.124. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. A local intellectual and developmental disability authority may appoint a committee to advise its governing board on a matter relating to the oversight and provision of intellectual disability services. The appointment of a committee does not relieve the authority's governing board of a responsibility prescribed by this subtitle.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS

Sec. 534.151. HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY. (a) One or more community centers may create or operate a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the laws of this state for the purpose of accepting capitated or other at-risk payment arrangements for the provision of services designated in a plan approved by each appropriate department under Subchapter A.

(b) Before a nonprofit corporation organized or operating under Subsection (a) accepts or enters into any capitated or other at-risk payment arrangement for services designated in a plan approved by each appropriate department under Subchapter A, the nonprofit corporation must obtain the appropriate certificate of authority from the Texas Department of Insurance to operate as a health maintenance organization pursuant to Chapter 843, Insurance Code.

(c) Before submitting any bids, a nonprofit corporation operating under this subchapter shall disclose in an open meeting the services to be provided by the community center through any capitated or other at-risk payment arrangement by the nonprofit corporation. Notice of the meeting must be posted in accordance with Sections 551.041, 551.043, and 551.054, Government Code. Each appropriate department shall verify that the services provided under any capitated or other at-risk payment arrangement are within the scope of services approved by each appropriate department in each community center's plan required under Subchapter A.

(d) The board of the nonprofit corporation shall:

(1) provide for public notice of the nonprofit corporation's intent to submit a bid to provide or arrange services through a capitated or other at-risk payment arrangement through placement as a board agenda item on the next regularly scheduled board meeting that allows at least 15 days' public review of the plan; and

(2) provide an opportunity for public comment on the services to be provided through such arrangements and on the consideration of local input into the plan.

(e) The nonprofit corporation shall provide:

(1) public notice before verification and disclosure of services to be provided by the community center through any capitated or other at-risk payment arrangements by the nonprofit corporation;

(2) an opportunity for public comment on the community center services within the capitated or other at-risk payment arrangements offered by the nonprofit corporation;

(3) published summaries of all relevant documentation concerning community center services arranged through the nonprofit corporation, including summaries of any similar contracts the nonprofit corporation has entered into; and

(4) public access and review of all relevant documentation.

(f) A nonprofit corporation operating under this subchapter:

(1) is subject to the requirements of Chapters 551 and 552, Government Code;

(2) shall solicit public input on the operations of the nonprofit corporation and allow public access to information on the operations, including services, administration, governance, revenues, and expenses, on request unless disclosure is expressly prohibited by law or the information is confidential under law; and

(3) shall publish an annual report detailing the services, administration, governance, revenues, and expenses of the nonprofit corporation, including the disposition of any excess revenues.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.152. LAWS AND RULES. A nonprofit corporation created or operated under this subchapter that obtains and holds a valid certificate of authority as a health maintenance organization may exercise the powers and authority and is subject to the conditions and limitations provided by this subchapter, Chapter 843, Insurance Code, the Texas Nonprofit Corporation Law as described by Section 1.008(d), Business Organizations Code, and rules of the Texas Department of Insurance.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.153. APPLICATION OF LAWS AND RULES. A health maintenance organization created and operating under this subchapter is governed as, and is subject to the same laws and rules of the Texas Department of Insurance as, any other health maintenance organization of the same type. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules as necessary to accept funding sources other than the sources specified by Section 843.405, Insurance Code, from a nonprofit health maintenance organization created and operating under this subchapter, to meet the minimum surplus requirements of that section.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.154. APPLICABILITY OF SPECIFIC LAWS. (a) A nonprofit health maintenance organization created under Section 534.151 is a health care provider that is a nonprofit health maintenance organization created and operated by a community center for purposes of Section 84.007(e), Civil Practice and Remedies Code. The nonprofit health maintenance organization is not a governmental unit or a unit of local government, for purposes of Chapters 101 and 102, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, respectively, or a local government for purposes of Chapter 791, Government Code.

(b) Nothing in this subchapter precludes one or more community centers from forming a nonprofit corporation under Chapter 162, Occupations Code, to provide services on a risk-sharing or capitated basis as permitted under Chapter 844, Insurance Code.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.155. CONSIDERATION OF BIDS. Each appropriate department shall give equal consideration to bids submitted by any entity, whether it be public, for-profit, or nonprofit, if the department accepts bids to provide services through a capitated or at-risk payment arrangement and if the entities meet all other criteria as required by the department.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 534.156. CONDITIONS FOR CERTAIN CONTRACTS. A contract between each appropriate department and a health maintenance organization formed by one or more community centers must provide that the health maintenance organization may not form a for-profit entity unless the organization transfers all of the organization's assets to the control of the boards of trustees of the community centers that formed the organization.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1336, eff. April 2, 2015.